Idaho, session 2026, H0622.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1020, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1020. IDAHO DIGITAL LEARNING ACADEMY FUNDING.
(1)(a) An amount of four hundred forty-five dollars ($445) four hundred
twenty-seven dollars ($427) per enrollment shall be distributed to sup-
port the Idaho digital learning academy, created pursuant to chapter
55, title 33, Idaho Code. For the purposes of this section, an "enroll-
ment" shall be counted each time an Idaho school age child enrolls in
an Idaho digital learning academy class and continues to be enrolled in
such class past the deadline to withdraw, where such withdrawal would
not result in the class appearing on such child's transcript in any way.
A single child enrolled in multiple classes shall count as multiple en-
rollments may be counted for only up to three (3) enrollments per school
year, not including summer enrollments. Summer enrollments shall be
included in the fiscal year that begins that summer. An enrollment
shall be eligible for state funding only if:
(i) The student is enrolled full time in an Idaho school district
or public charter school that is not entirely virtual;
(ii) The student is in grades 6 through 12;
(iii) The class is not a driver's education class; and
(iv) The student is not enrolled in a public school or public char-
ter school that is located in a city with a population of more than
fifty thousand (50,000) and is not enrolled in a custom section. A
"custom section" means an Idaho digital learning academy class in
which all enrollments are from one (1) school district.
(b) If a student wants to enroll in an Idaho digital learning academy
class that does not meet the criteria for state funding under this sec-
tion, such student may enroll in such class if the school district or
public charter school pays the fees for the class as set by the Idaho
digital learning academy.
(2) The state department of education shall make an estimated distri-
bution of funds to the Idaho digital learning academy by no later than July
31 of each fiscal year, consisting of eighty percent (80%) of the estimated
funding for the fiscal year. The balance of all remaining funds to be dis-
tributed, pursuant to the calculations in this section, shall be distributed
by no later than May 15 of the same fiscal year. The state department of
education shall reconcile the enrollments prior to the May 15 payment and


withhold or recover any costs necessary to align the funding with verified
enrollments. The joint finance-appropriations committee shall consider
adjusting the per enrollment amount each legislative session by a percent-
age increase equal to the percentage increase approved for salary increases
for instructional and pupil service staff pursuant to section 33-1004B,
Idaho Code, and for administrative and classified staff pursuant to section
33-1004E, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.